Utah statutes.
13-2-7.   Violation of restraining or injunctive order -- Civil penalty.

If any restraining order, any chapter administered by the division, or injunction granted under this chapter is violated, the division may submit a motion for, or the court on its own motion, may impose a civil penalty of not more than $2,000 for each day a temporary restraining order, preliminary injunction or permanent injunction issued under this chapter is violated, if the party has received notice of the restraining or injunctive order.



Amended by Chapter 177, 1994 General Session

